Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.320

Nomination—What names on ballots—How counted.

(1) In the year in which a presidential election is held, each major political party and each minor political party or independent candidate convention that nominates candidates for president and vice president of the United States shall nominate presidential electors for this state. The party or convention shall file with the secretary of state a certificate signed by the presiding officer of the convention at which the presidential electors were chosen, listing the names and addresses of the presidential electors.

(2) The names of presidential electors shall not appear on the ballots. The votes cast for candidates for president and vice president of each political party shall be counted for the candidates for presidential electors of that political party; however, if the interstate compact entitled the "agreement among the states to elect the president by national popular vote," as set forth in RCW 29A.56.300, governs the appointment of the presidential electors for a presidential election as provided in clause 9 of Article III of that compact, then the final appointment of presidential electors for that presidential election shall be in accordance with that compact.

[ 2019 c 143 s 10; 2013 c 11 s 56; 2009 c 264 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 1425. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 69; 1977 ex.s. c 238 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.71.020; prior: 1935 c 20 s 1; RRS s 5138-1. Formerly RCW 29.71.020.]

NOTES:

Short title—Uniformity of application and construction—2019 c 143: See notes following RCW 29A.56.080.

Intent—2009 c 264: See note following RCW 29A.56.300.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.